Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-713.01
Limitation of actions.

Every claim and demand under the Judges Retirement Act and against the retirement system or the board shall be forever barred unless the action is brought within two years of the time at which the claim accrued.

Laws 1996, LB 1076, § 11;

Laws 2004, LB 1097, § 19.